src/morphology/affixes/noun.lexc
LEXICON h_flt12
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h13 ! setur
h13e ;
h_flt13 ;

LEXICON h13e 
+N+Neu:%^EPH S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu:%^EPH S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt13
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h14 ! pistr
h14e ;
h_flt14 ;

LEXICON h14e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt14
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h15 ! tjaldur
h15e ;
h15f ;

LEXICON h15e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h15f
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

! Start here.
LEXICON h16 ! skýggj
h16e ;
h_flt16 ;

LEXICON h16e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu:%^JI S_N_SGD_i ;    !skýggi
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD ;          !skýggj
+N+Neu:%^GGDEL S_N_SGG_s ; !krýs

LEXICON h_flt16f
h_flt16 ;

LEXICON h_flt16
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h17 ! kriggj
h17e ;
h_flt17 ;

LEXICON h17e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu:%^JI S_N_SGD_i ;    !kríggi
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD ;          !kríggj
+N+Neu:%^GDEL S_N_SGG_s ;  !krígs

LEXICON h_flt17
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h18 ! týggi
h18e ;
h_flt18 ;

LEXICON h18e
+N+Neu: i_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: i_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt18
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h19 ! prógv
h19e ;
h_flt19 ;

LEXICON h19e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt19
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h20 ! búgv
h20e ;
h_flt20 ;

LEXICON h20e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i ;
+N+Neu:%^GVDEL S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON h_flt20
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h21 ! plógv
h21e ;
h_flt21 ;

LEXICON h21e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt21
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h22 ! ber
h22e ;
h_flt22 ;

LEXICON h22e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt22
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h23 ! egg
h23e ;
h_flt23 ;

LEXICON h23e 
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt23
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h24 ! kvæði
h24e ;
h_flt24r ;

LEXICON h_flt24e
h24e ;

LEXICON h24e
+N+Neu: i_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt24r
+N+Neu: N_PLNA_i_ir ;
!          h_flt24 ; ! Ordinary pl
!+N+Neu:r N_PLNA ;   ! "Danish" r pl.
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h_flt24
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h25 ! merki
h25e ;
h_flt25 ;

LEXICON h25e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt25
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h26 ! tiðindi
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h27 ! systkin
h27e ;
h_flt27 ;

LEXICON h27e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt27
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h28 ! bakari
h28e ;
h_flt28 ;

LEXICON h28e
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;  !bakarí
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD ;   ! bakarí
+N+Neu: S_N_SGD_i ; ! bakaríi
+N+Neu: S_N_SGG_s ; ! bakarís

LEXICON h_flt28
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h29 ! kamar
h29e ;
h_flt29 ;

LEXICON h29e 
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt29 
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h30 ! summar
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h31 ! nummar
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h32 ! høvd
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h33 ! høvur
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;


LEXICON h34 ! fæ
+N+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
+N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N_PLD ;
+N+Neu: N_PLG ;

LEXICON h42
+N+Neu: FINAL ; !check.


! =============== !
! Case inflection !
! =============== !

! This is the second layer. Here we do the indefinite
! forms.

! Masculine forms
! _______________

! Weak case suffixes.
 
LEXICON W_M_SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF_N_SGm_indef ;
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF_N_SGm_def ;

LEXICON W_M_SGACC
+Sg+Acc:%>a   DF_A_SGm ; ! risan

LEXICON W_M_SGDAT
+Sg+Dat:%>a  DF_D_SGm ;

LEXICON W_M_SGDAT_mixed !felagnum
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>a  FINAL ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>num FINAL ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>num R ;

LEXICON W_M_SGGEN
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a FINAL ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans FINAL ; !XXX ans?
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans R ;


! Plural

LEXICON W_M_PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLNOM_UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLACC
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLACC_UR
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON W_M_PLDAT
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON W_M_PLGEN
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;



! Strong case suffixes
! ____________________



LEXICON DF_NA_SGm_S ! luður
+Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;
+Sg+Acc: DF_A_SGm_indef ;
+Sg+Acc: DF_A_SGm_def ;


! Nominative Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>ur DF_N_SGm_indef ;
+Sg+Nom:%>uri DF_N_SGm_def ;

LEXICON S_M_SGNOM_NULL
+Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;
+Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;


! Accusative Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGACC
+Sg+Acc: DF_A_SGm_indef ;
+Sg+Acc:%>i DF_A_SGm_def ; !sandin


! Dative Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGDAT
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF_D_SGm ;

LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_2
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF_D_SGm ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%^GVDEL%>num #;

LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_NULL
+Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGm ;

! Genitive Sg

LEXICON S_M_SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>s DF_G_SGm ;

LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_NULL
+Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGm ;

LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_AR
+Sg+Gen:%>ar DF_G_SGm ;

! Plural forms

! Nominative

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_IR
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_N_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL
+Pl+Nom:    DF_N_PLm_indef ;
+Pl+Nom:%>i DF_N_PLm_def ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL_IR
+Pl+Nom:     DF_N_PLm_indef ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_N_PLm_def ;

LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL_I_IR
+Pl+Nom:     DF_N_PLm_indef ;
+Pl+Nom:%>i DF_N_PLm_def ; !SUB Bible
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_N_PLm_def ;


! Accusative

LEXICON S_M_PLACC
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_IR
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_UR
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_A_PLm ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL
+Pl+Acc:    DF_A_PLm_indef ;
+Pl+Acc:%>i DF_A_PLm_def ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL_IR
+Pl+Acc:     DF_A_PLm_indef ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_A_PLm_def ;

LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL_I_IR
+Pl+Acc:     DF_A_PLm_indef ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_A_PLm_def ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_A_PLm_def ;

!LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL_I
!+Pl+Acc: DF_A_PLm_I ;


! Dative

LEXICON S_M_PLDAT
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON S_M_PLDATm ! skóm
+Pl+Dat: DF_D_PL ;

! Genitive

LEXICON S_M_PLGEN
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;
+Pl+Gen:%>a R ; !XXX


! Feminine forms
! ______________

! Singular case suffixes.

! Nominative

LEXICON W_F_SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_N_SGf_W ;

LEXICON S_F_SGNAD
+Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGf_S ;
+Sg+Acc: DF_A_SGf_S ;
+Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGf_S ;

! Oblique

LEXICON W_F_SGOBL
+Sg+Acc:%>u DF_A_SGf_W ;
+Sg+Dat:%>u DF_D_SGf_W ;
+Sg+Gen:%>u DF_G_SGf_W ;

LEXICON S_F_SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>ar DF_G_SGf_S ;

LEXICON S_F_SGGEN_NULL
+Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGf_S ;




! Plural case suffixes

LEXICON F_PLNA_UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLNA_IR
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_NA_PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLNA_AR
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLNA_NULL
+Pl+Nom: DF_NA_PLf ;
+Pl+Acc: DF_NA_PLf ;

LEXICON F_PLDAT 
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;

LEXICON F_PLGEN 
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;


! Neuter forms
! ____________

LEXICON S_N_SGNA
+Sg+Nom: DF_NA_SGn ;
+Sg+Acc: DF_NA_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGDG
+Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGn ;
+Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGD
+Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGG
+Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGDG_is
S_N_SGD_i ;
S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON S_N_SGD_i
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF_D_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGG_s
+Sg+Gen:%>s DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON S_N_SGG_is
+Sg+Gen:%>is DF_G_SGn ;

LEXICON i_N_SGNA
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF_NA_SGn_def ;
+Sg+Acc:%>i DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
+Sg+Acc:%>i DF_NA_SGn_def ;

LEXICON i_N_SGDG_is
+Sg+Gen:%>is DF_G_SGn ;
+Sg+Dat:%>is DF_D_SGn ;
