src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
plógv h21 ;
tíðindi:tíðind h26 ;
systkin h27 ;
nummar h31 ;
agnaspjaldur h15 ;
alinstjógv h20 ;
aputýggi h18 ;
avgustahøvur h33 ;
battarí h28 ;
bleytegg h23 ;
blómkálshøvd h32 ;
bløði:bløð h24e ;
borgarakríggj:borgarakríggj h17 ;
borðfæ h34 ;
brimsummar h30 ;
brosmuhógv h19e ;
brunahoyggj h16e ;
bryggj h17e ;
bráðfeingi:bráðfeing h25 ;
budingspulvur h29e ;
bustartróður h13 ;
bønamøti:bønamøt h24 ;
búfæ h34 ;
búgv h20 ;
deiggj h17e ;
deyðsbúgv h20 ;
doðaveður h13e ;
drýladeiggj h17e ;
dylhøvur h33 ;
eggjapulvur h29e ;
einsmanskamar h29 ;
einvíggi h18 ;
ekkaloysi:ekkaloys h24e ;
eldker h22 ;
felagsbúgv h20 ;
felagskyn h22e ;
festarfæ h34 ;
fiskadeiggj:fiskadeiggj h17 ;
fiskamerki:fiskamerk h25 ;
fiskarí h28e ;
fiskaslógv h21e ;
fjallatáraflíggj h16 ;
fjantavesin h29e ;
fjákavesin h29e ;
fjørutjaldur h15 ;
fleyggj h16e ;
forræði:forræð h24 ;
framíhjáprógv h19 ;
førleikafæ h34 ;
gandakynstur h13 ;
gestakamar h29 ;
glantarí h28 ;
glentrarí h28 ;
glitur h13e ;
glopr h14 ;
gløgg h23e ;
goyggj h16 ;
gullker h22 ;
gummi h28e ;
gágguhøvd h32 ;
gásaregg h23 ;
gíggj:gíggj h17 ;
góðsummar h30 ;
góðvarni:góðvarn h24e ;
hamborgartógv h20e ;
hamskifti:hamskift h24 ;
hanareðr h14 ;
handahógv h19e ;
handaslógv h21e ;
hapurtýggi h18 ;
heimabryggj h17e ;
heimatroyggjutógv h20e ;
heitstreingi:heitstreing h25 ;
heiðursprógv h19 ;
hestreðr h14 ;
himpr h14 ;
hosutógv h20e ;
hoyggj h16 ;
hugfostur h13 ;
hundshøvur h33 ;
hvalspýggj h16 ;
hvørkikyn h22e ;
hyggi h18 ;
hásummar h30 ;
hógv h19e ;
hóreiggj:hóreiggj h17 ;
høsnaregg h23 ;
høvur h33 ;
húsakynstur h13e ;
iglahoyggj h16e ;
illveðurssummar h30 ;
ivaføri:ivafør h24 ;
kallkyn h22e ;
kalvaspjaldur h15 ;
kamar h29 ;
kamshøvd h32 ;
kavaplógv h21 ;
kellingarnev h22 ;
kjalarhoyggj h16e ;
kjúklingsegg h23 ;
klammarí h28e ;
klyvjaportur h13 ;
knipr h14 ;
kolakógv h19 ;
kotatógv h20e ;
kryddarí h28 ;
krákuklíggj h16 ;
kvennkyn h22e ;
kyrrsoyði:kyrrsoyð h24e ;
kásalóti:kásalót h24 ;
kógv h19e ;
leiur h13e ;
leysafæ h34 ;
livurhøvur h33 ;
loftskamar h29 ;
lokahylki:lokahylk h25 ;
lundaegg h23 ;
lundahøvd h32 ;
lutaprógv h19 ;
lágriv h22 ;
lánsfæ h34 ;
lúsareiður h13 ;
mannkyn h22e ;
manntýggi h18 ;
manskyn h22e ;
maskinarí h28 ;
matarmýggj h16e ;
midsummar:midsummar h30 ;
mikkjalsmessumøti:mikkjalsmessumøt h24 ;
mjólkarpulvur h29e ;
mjørkakógv h19e ;
munnskvaldur h15e ;
myrkakamar h29 ;
mótstøðuføri:mótstøðufør h24e ;
navnaprógv h19 ;
nervakríggj h17 ;
neytahøvd h32 ;
neytahøvur h33 ;
nummar h31 ;
nummarspjaldur h15 ;
nyðrutógv h20e ;
oksatjógv h20 ;
omanfleyggj h17e ;
orðaskvaldur h15e ;
orðskvaldur h15e ;
partaníggj h16 ;
partsreiðarí h28 ;
perlur h13e ;
plógv h21 ;
politi:polit h28e ; !XXX Not h24e
posaspjaldur h15 ;
postnummar h31 ;
prestsetur h13 ;
pístr h14 ;
pústr h14 ;
reiðarí h28 ;
reiðregg h23 ;
rentukamar h29 ;
reðr h14 ;
rossatógv h20e ;
royðuber h22 ;
rummalareiggj h17 ;
rívuhøvd h32 ;
røðilsnummar h31 ;
rúmdarhylki:rúmdarhylk h25 ;
samkyn h22e ;
samleikaprógv h19 ;
seiggi h18e ;
seiggj h17 ;
seingjarhoyggj h16e ;
sildaspjaldur h15 ;
sjerri h28e ;
sjálvbjargni:sjálvbjargn h24e ;
skarnveður h13e ;
skerpitjógv h20 ;
skjaldur h13 ;
skortbílæti:skortbílæt h24 ;
skrápsnev h22 ;
skvaldur h15e ;
skyggi h18 ;
skølingstógv h20e ;
skúgv h19 ;
skúripulvur h29e ;
slavarí h28e ;
slupr h14e ;
slógv h21e ;
smørdeiggj h17e ;
spískamar h29 ;
spósegg h23 ;
spøkjarí h28e ;
stormskýggj h16 ;
stovnsfæ h34 ;
summar h30 ;
sveinaprógv h19 ;
svávul h13e ;
syllaplógv h21 ;
sátubarnahoyggj h16e ;
síðsetur h13 ;
sógv h19e ;
súluhøvur h33 ;
súrdeiggj h17e ;
tampardagur h42 ;
tarvsmerki:tarvsmerk h25 ;
telefonnummar h31 ;
teymaspjaldur h15 ;
tjaldursnev h22 ;
tjógv h20 ;
toskarhøvd h32 ;
tríggi h18 ;
trúarlýdni:trúarlýdn h24e ;
tváttpulvur h29e ;
týningartippi:týningartipp h24 ;
varraskvaldur h15e ;
vaskarí h28 ;
vattasummar h30 ;
vattatógv h20e ;
vaðblýggj h16 ;
veiggj h17 ;
vetrartjaldur h15 ;
vánaveður h13e ;
víggj h17e ;
áarslýggj h16e ;
ættarkyn h22 ;
ídnaðarvirki:ídnaðarvirk h25 ;
óhógv h19e ;
óhøgindi:óhøgind h26 ;
óreinføri:óreinfør h24e ;
ótoyggi h18 ;
øksarskegg:øksarskegg h23 ;
útibú(gv) h20 ;
